Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6060.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16186. (1) An individual who is licensed to practice a health profession in another state or in a province of Canada, who is registered in another state, or who holds a health profession specialty field license or specialty certification from another state and who applies for licensure, registration, specialty certification, or a health profession specialty field license in this state may be granted an appropriate license or registration or specialty certification or health profession specialty field license upon satisfying the board or task force to which the applicant applies as to all of the following: (a) The applicant substantially meets the requirements of this article and rules promulgated under this article for licensure, registration, specialty certification, or a health profession specialty field license. (b) Subject to subsection (3), the applicant is licensed, registered, specialty certified, or specialty licensed in another state or is licensed in a province in Canada that maintains standards substantially equivalent to those of this state. (c) Subject to subsection (3), if the applicant is licensed to practice a health profession in a province in Canada, the applicant completed the educational requirements in Canada or in the United States for licensure in Canada or in the United States. (d) If the applicant is licensed to practice a health profession in a province in Canada, that the applicant will perform the professional services for which he or she the applicant bills in this state, and that any resulting request for third-party reimbursement will originate from the applicant's place of employment in this state. (e) The applicant held the license, registration, specialty certification, or health profession specialty field license in another state or a province of Canada for not less than 1 year. (2) Before granting a license, registration, specialty certification, or a health profession specialty field license to the applicant, the board or task force to which the applicant applies may require the applicant to appear personally before it for an interview to evaluate the applicant's relevant qualifications. (3) An applicant who is licensed in a province in Canada who meets the requirements of subsection (1)(c) and takes and passes a national examination in this country that is approved by the appropriate licensing board of this state, or who takes and passes a Canadian national examination approved by the appropriate licensing board of this state, is considered to have met the requirements of subsection (1)(b). This subsection does not apply if the department, in consultation with the appropriate licensing board, promulgates a rule disallowing the use of this subsection for an applicant licensed in a province in Canada who does not substantially meet the training or educational requirements expected of an applicant for the same health profession who received his or her education for the health profession in the United States or who is not licensed in a province in Canada that maintains standards substantially equivalent to those of this state. (4) If the department receives an application for licensure under part 187 from an individual who is licensed as a respiratory therapist in Canada, the department shall consult the international reciprocity agreement executed by the National Board for Respiratory Care and the Canadian Society of Respiratory Therapists in effect on July 1, 2004. (5) Within 90 days after receiving a completed application under this section, the department shall grant or deny the request for a license, registration, specialty certification, or health profession specialty field license. (6) This section does not prevent an applicant from being granted a license, registration, specialty certification, or health profession specialty field license under another provision of this article. (7) This section does not apply to a license granted under an interstate licensing compact applicable to a health profession under this article, does not apply to criteria for a license established under an interstate licensing compact applicable to a health profession under this article, and does not make an individual who is licensed under this section eligible to be part of an interstate licensing compact applicable to a health profession under this article. Sec. 16186a. (1) Notwithstanding Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, an applicant must be granted an initial license or initial registration, without examination, if the applicant meets all of the following: (a) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that he or she the applicant is 1 of the following: (i) A member of the armed forces or the uniformed services. (ii) A veteran. (iii) A dependent of a member of the armed forces, a member of the uniformed services, or a veteran. (b) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that he or she the applicant holds a current license or registration in good standing in another state or country for the health profession for which the applicant is seeking licensure or registration in this state and the department determines that the requirements for licensure or registration in the other state or country are substantially equivalent to or exceed the requirements of this article and rules promulgated by the department, in consultation with the applicable board, under this article for licensure or registration. (c) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that he or she the applicant is competent in the health profession for which he or she the applicant is seeking licensure or registration, as demonstrated by the applicant's training or experience or by another method prescribed by the department, in consultation with the applicable board. (d) He or she The applicant complies with section 16174(3) so that a criminal history check is conducted in the manner prescribed in that section. (2) Within 90 days after receiving a completed application under this section, the department shall grant or deny the request for a license or registration. (3) This section does not prevent the department from granting a temporary license or registration to a dependent under section 16181. (4) (2) As used in this section, "dependent" and "veteran" mean those terms as defined in section 16303.